Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-1001
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1001 to 38-10,172 shall be known and may be cited as the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-340;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 263;

Laws 2016, LB898, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB449, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB720, § 1.
March 13, 2026